parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/FRENCH/APPLICATIONS/ACCENTUATION/FST2/src/guesser.xfst
# ============================================================================
# TYPE:		(x)fst script
# CONTENT:      morphological guesser
# 
# LANGUAGE:     FRENCH
#
# AUTHOR:       A.Schiller
#
# CREATED:      13-Jul-2007 (AS) 
#
# ============================================================================
# USAGE:        xfst -l [ThisFile]
# ============================================================================


define LOW	[a|à|â|ä|á|å|b|c|ç|d|e|é|è|ê|ë|f|g|h|i|î|ï|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|o|ô|ö|ó
		|p|q|r|s|t|u|ù|û|ü|v|w|x|y|z];

define UPP	[A|À|Â|Ä|Á|Å|B|C|Ç|D|E|É|È|Ê|Ë|F|G|H|I|Î|Ï|J|K|L|M|N|Ñ|O|Ô|Ö|Ó
		|P|Q|R|S|T|U|Ù|Û|Ü|V|W|X|Y|Z];

define CONS	[b|c|ç|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|y|z];
define VOWEL	[a|à|â|ä|á|å|e|é|è|ê|ë|i|î|ï|o|ô|ö|ó|u|ù|û|ü|y];

define LET	LOW | UPP ;

define SPEC	[ %_ | %' ]; # | %- ];

define CHAR	LET | SPEC ;

define DIG	[ %0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 ];
define OPS 	[  %, | %. |  %> | %< |  %* | %( | %) | %- | %+ | %/ | %= | %% ] ;


define Stem	[LOW|%-]  [ LOW | SPEC ]* LOW ;


# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# NOUNS
# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
define NounFem	 Stem [ {tion} | {sion} | {rice} | {euse} ];

define NounMasc [ Stem [ {eur} | {age} | {ment} | {al} ] ]
		- [ ?* [ {able} | {ible} | {ique} | {ive} ] {ment} ];

define NounSg	[ Stem - [ NounFem|NounMasc] ]
		- [ ?* [ s| x | z |  {era} (i (t)) | {ira} (i (t)) | Cons i r ] ] ;

define Nouns [
  NounMasc		[%+Noun %+Common %+Sg %+Masc]:0
| NounMasc 0:{+s}	[%+Noun %+Common %+Pl %+Masc]:0
| NounFem		[%+Noun %+Common %+Sg %+Fem]:0
| NounFem 0:{+s}	[%+Noun %+Common %+Pl %+Fem]:0
| NounSg		[%+Noun %+Common %+Sg %+MF]:0
| NounSg 0:{+s}		[%+Noun %+Common %+Pl %+MF]:0
];

define RulesNoun [ 
	{+s} -> 0  || [x|s] _
.o.	{al+s} -> {aux}
.o.	%+ -> 0
];

read regex Nouns .o. RulesNoun ;

# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# PROPER NOUNS
# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
define PropStem	UPP [LOW|UPP|SPEC]* - [UPP [NounFem|NounMasc] ];

read regex	[
  PropStem [%+Noun %+Prop]:0 
];

# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
#  ADVERBS
# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------

read regex [
  Stem	[ e | a m | e m | i ] {ment} 	%+Adv:0
];

# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# VERBS
# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------

#define CL	( %- ) ;
#define CLT	( %- (t %-) );

define CL	[] ;
define CLT	[] ;

define VERB	[ %+avoir %+SN %+Verb ];


# [1] regular forms, verb  class -er

define VStem 	Stem [CONS - [ç] | q u | o u ]  - [?* [ a n t | i o n | i e n n ]];


define VerbsEr	VStem [
# infinitive
  {er}		[VERB %+Inf]:0				# donner

# present participle
| {er}:{+ant}  	[VERB %+Pres %+Part]:0			# donnant

# present tense, indicative
| {er}:{+e}	[VERB %+Sg %+1 %+Pres %+Indic]:0 CL	# je donne
| {er}:{+es}	[VERB %+Sg %+2 %+Pres %+Indic]:0 CL	# tu donnes
| {er}:{+e}	[VERB %+Sg %+3 %+Pres %+Indic]:0 CLT	# il donne; donne-t-il
| {er}:{+ons} 	[VERB %+Pl %+1 %+Pres %+Indic]:0 CL	# nous donnons
| {er}:{+ez} 	[VERB %+Pl %+2 %+Pres %+Indic]:0 CL	# nous donnez
| {er}:{+ent} 	[VERB %+Pl %+3 %+Pres %+Indic]:0 CLT	# ils donnent 

# present tense, subjunctive
| {er}:{+e}	[VERB %+Sg %+1 %+Pres %+Subj]:0 CL	# je donne
| {er}:{+es}	[VERB %+Sg %+2 %+Pres %+Subj]:0 CL	# tu donnes
| {er}:{+e}	[VERB %+Sg %+3 %+Pres %+Subj]:0 CLT	# il donne; donne-t-il
| {er}:{+ions} 	[VERB %+Pl %+1 %+Pres %+Subj]:0 CL	# nous donnions
| {er}:{+iez} 	[VERB %+Pl %+2 %+Pres %+Subj]:0 CL	# nous donniez
| {er}:{+ent} 	[VERB %+Pl %+3 %+Pres %+Subj]:0 CLT	# ils donnent 

# future tense
| {er} 0:{ai} 	[VERB %+Sg %+1 %+Fut %+Indic]:0 CL	# je donnerai
| {er} 0:{as} 	[VERB %+Sg %+2 %+Fut %+Indic]:0 CL	# tu donneras
| {er} 0:{a} 	[VERB %+Sg %+2 %+Fut %+Indic]:0 CLT	# il donnera
| {er} 0:{ons} 	[VERB %+Pl %+1 %+Fut %+Indic]:0 CL	# nous donnerons
| {er} 0:{ez}	[VERB %+Pl %+2 %+Fut %+Indic]:0 CL	# vous donnerez
| {er} 0:{ont}	[VERB %+Pl %+2 %+Fut %+Indic]:0 CLT	# ils donneront

# conditional
| {er} 0:{ais} 	[VERB %+Sg %+1 %+Pres %+Cond]:0 CL	# je donnerais
| {er} 0:{ais} 	[VERB %+Sg %+2 %+Pres %+Cond]:0 CL	# tu donnerais
| {er} 0:{ait} 	[VERB %+Sg %+2 %+Pres %+Cond]:0 CLT	# il donnerait
| {er} 0:{ions} [VERB %+Pl %+1 %+Pres %+Cond]:0 CL	# nous donnerions
| {er} 0:{iez}	[VERB %+Pl %+2 %+Pres %+Cond]:0 CL	# vous donneriez
| {er} 0:{aient} [VERB %+Pl %+2 %+Pres %+Cond]:0 CLT	# ils donneriont

# past tense, indicative  (imparfait)
| {er}:{+ais} 	[VERB %+Sg %+1 %+Impar %+Indic]:0 CL	# je donnais
| {er}:{+ais} 	[VERB %+Sg %+2 %+Impar %+Indic]:0 CL	# tu donnais
| {er}:{+ait} 	[VERB %+Sg %+3 %+Impar %+Indic]:0 CL	# il donnait
| {er}:{+ions} 	[VERB %+Sg %+1 %+Impar %+Indic]:0 CL	# nous donnions
| {er}:{+iez} 	[VERB %+Sg %+2 %+Impar %+Indic]:0 CL	# vous donniez
| {er}:{+aient} [VERB %+Sg %+3 %+Impar %+Indic]:0 CL	# ils donnaient

# NOTE: not included are passé simple, subjonctif II

# past participle
| {er}:{+é}	[VERB %+Sg %+Masc %+Past %+Part]:0	# donné
| {er}:{+ée}	[VERB %+Sg %+Fem %+Past %+Part]:0	# donnée
| {er}:{+és}	[VERB %+Pl %+Masc %+Past %+Part]:0	# donnés
| {er}:{+ées}	[VERB %+Pl %+Fem %+Past %+Part]:0	# données
];

define RulesEr [
	{el+}	-> {ell} || _ e 	# appeler -> appelle
.o.	{ér+}	-> {èr}  || _ e 	# liberer -> libère
.o.	{g+} 	-> {ge} || _ [a|o]	# nager -> nageait
.o.	{c+} 	-> {ç}  || _ [a|o]	# rincer -> rinçait
.o.	{qu+} 	-> {c} 	|| _ [a|o]	# 
.o.	%+ -> 0
];		

read regex 	[ VerbsEr .o. RulesEr ] ;


# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# [2] regular forms, verb  class -ir

define VerbsIr	VStem [
# infinitive
  {ir}		[VERB %+Inf]:0				# maigrir

# present participle
| {ir}:{issant}  	[VERB %+Pres %+Part]:0			# magrissant

# present tense, indicative
| {ir}:{+is}		[VERB %+Sg %+1 %+Pres %+Indic]:0 CL	# je maigris
| {ir}:{+is}		[VERB %+Sg %+2 %+Pres %+Indic]:0 CL	# tu maigris
| {ir}:{+it}		[VERB %+Sg %+3 %+Pres %+Indic]:0 CLT	# il maigrit
| {ir}:{+issons} 	[VERB %+Pl %+1 %+Pres %+Indic]:0 CL	# nous maigrissons
| {ir}:{+issez} 	[VERB %+Pl %+2 %+Pres %+Indic]:0 CL	# vous maigrissez
| {ir}:{+issent} 	[VERB %+Pl %+3 %+Pres %+Indic]:0 CLT	# ils maigrissent 

# present tense, subjunctive
| {ir}:{+isse}		[VERB %+Sg %+1 %+Pres %+Subj]:0 CL	# je maigrisse
| {ir}:{+isses}		[VERB %+Sg %+2 %+Pres %+Subj]:0 CL
| {ir}:{+isse}		[VERB %+Sg %+3 %+Pres %+Subj]:0 CLT
| {ir}:{+issions} 	[VERB %+Pl %+1 %+Pres %+Subj]:0 CL
| {ir}:{+issiez} 	[VERB %+Pl %+2 %+Pres %+Subj]:0 CL
| {ir}:{+issent} 	[VERB %+Pl %+3 %+Pres %+Subj]:0 CLT

# future tense
| {ir} 0:{ai} 		[VERB %+Sg %+1 %+Fut %+Indic]:0 CL	# je maigrirai
| {ir} 0:{as} 		[VERB %+Sg %+2 %+Fut %+Indic]:0 CL
| {ir} 0:{a} 		[VERB %+Sg %+2 %+Fut %+Indic]:0 CLT
| {ir} 0:{ons} 		[VERB %+Pl %+1 %+Fut %+Indic]:0 CL
| {ir} 0:{ez}		[VERB %+Pl %+2 %+Fut %+Indic]:0 CL
| {ir} 0:{ont}		[VERB %+Pl %+2 %+Fut %+Indic]:0 CLT

# conditional
| {ir} 0:{ais} 		[VERB %+Sg %+1 %+Pres %+Cond]:0 CL	# je maigrirais
| {ir} 0:{ais} 		[VERB %+Sg %+2 %+Pres %+Cond]:0 CL
| {ir} 0:{ait} 		[VERB %+Sg %+2 %+Pres %+Cond]:0 CLT
| {ir} 0:{ions} 	[VERB %+Pl %+1 %+Pres %+Cond]:0 CL
| {ir} 0:{iez}		[VERB %+Pl %+2 %+Pres %+Cond]:0 CL
| {ir} 0:{aient}	[VERB %+Pl %+2 %+Pres %+Cond]:0 CLT

# past tense, indicative  (imparfait)
| {ir}:{+issais} 	[VERB %+Sg %+1 %+Impar %+Indic]:0 CL	# je maigrissais
| {ir}:{+issais} 	[VERB %+Sg %+2 %+Impar %+Indic]:0 CL
| {ir}:{+issait} 	[VERB %+Sg %+3 %+Impar %+Indic]:0 CL
| {ir}:{+issions} 	[VERB %+Sg %+1 %+Impar %+Indic]:0 CL
| {ir}:{+issiez} 	[VERB %+Sg %+2 %+Impar %+Indic]:0 CL
| {ir}:{+issaient} 	[VERB %+Sg %+3 %+Impar %+Indic]:0 CL

# NOTE: not included are passé simple, subjonctif II

# past participle
| {ir}:{+is}	[VERB %+Sg %+Masc %+Past %+Part]:0	# maigris
| {ir}:{+ise}	[VERB %+Sg %+Fem %+Past %+Part]:0	# maigrise
| {ir}:{+is}	[VERB %+Pl %+Masc %+Past %+Part]:0	# maigris
| {ir}:{+ises}	[VERB %+Pl %+Fem %+Past %+Part]:0	# maigrises
];

define RulesIr [
	%+ -> 0
];		

read regex 	[ VerbsIr .o. RulesIr ] ;



# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# ADJECTIVES
# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------

# [1] regular forms (fem.sg +e, masc.pl +s, fem.pl +es)
define AStem1	[ Stem [ {ant} | {aud} | {il} | {ol} | {u} | {ent} ] ]
		- [ ?* [ {qu} | {gu} | {ment} | {aient} ] ] ;

# [2] invariant masc (masc.pl=masc.sg +0 , fem.sg +e, fem.pl +es)
define AStem2	[ Stem [ {ais} | {ois} ]]
		- [ ?* [ {erais} | {irais} ] ] ;

# [3] invariant gender (fem.sg=masc.sg +0, fem.pl=masc.pl +s)
define AStem3	Stem 	[ {able} | {aire} | {âtre} 
			| {ible} | {ique} | {ïque} | {iste} | {ïste}
			| {oire} ];

# [4] phonological mapping masc->fem
define AIrreg	Stem 	[ {el}:{elle} | {et}:{ette} | {éen}:{éenne} 
			| {eux}:{euse} | {eur}:{euse} | {teur}:{trice} 
			| {er}:{ère} | {et}:{ète} | {ien}:{ienne} 
			| {if}:{ive} | {ot}:{otte} ];

define AMascSg	AStem1 | AStem2 | AStem3 | AIrreg.u | {al} ;
define AMascPl	AStem1 0:s | AStem2 | AStem3 0:s | [AIrreg].u 0:s | {aux} ;
define AFemSg	AStem1 0:e | AStem2 0:e | AStem3 | AIrreg | {al}:{ale} ;
define AFemPl	AFemSg 0:s;

read regex	[
  AMascSg	[%+Adj %+Qual %+Sg %+Masc]:0
| AFemSg	[%+Adj %+Qual %+Sg %+Fem]:0
| AMascPl	[%+Adj %+Qual %+Pl %+Masc]:0
| AFemPl	[%+Adj %+Qual %+Pl %+Fem]:0
];

# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# NUMERICAL EXPRESSIONS
# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------

define NUM	[ [DIG|OPS]+ & $[DIG] ] - [ ?* [%,|%.] ];

define BR1	[ %< | %( | %[ ];
define BR2	[ %> | %) | %] ];

read regex 	(BR1) NUM (BR2)	%+Num:0 %+Dig:0 ;

# ------------------------------------------------------------------
# combine all

union net

# add +Guessed feature

define GUESSER

read regex GUESSER %+Guessed:0 ;





exit

######################
# TODO





define NounInv [WordAndCap [x | z | [a|o] i s]  - [WordAndCap a u x]] | %% |
                             (%*) Capital [AllLetter | Capital |DIG]* ;

define NounInv NounInv - [?* %'] ;



read regex
[T h e | t h e]     %+InvGen:0 %+InvPL:0  %+Det:0         %+DET%_SG:0          | 
[ o f | O f | O F | w i t h ]       %+Prep:0        %+PREP:0  |
q u		                %+ConjQue:0     %+CONJQUE:0 |
[q u o i | p u i s | l o r s] q u       %+SConj:0        %+CONN:0 
;
